test/src/morphology/V-vuajdnet_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - vuäjdnet: # Verb 'to see' - ei tsekattu
     vuäjdnet+V+Inf: vuäjdnet
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuojnáv
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuojná
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuäjdná
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vuäjnájin
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vuäjnábehtin
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vuäjnába
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuäjnáp
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuäjnábihtit
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuäjnáji

     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuojniv
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuojni
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuojnij
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuojnijmen
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuojnijden
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuojn
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuojn
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuojn
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuojn

     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Sg1: vuäjdnetjav
     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Sg2: vuäjdnetja
     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Sg3: vuäjdnetj
     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Du1: vuäjdnetjin
     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Du2: [vuäjdnetjehpin, vuäjdnetjähppen] 
     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Du3: vuäjdnetjebá
     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Pl1: vuäjdnetjip
     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Pl2: vuäjdnetjihpit
     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Pl3: vuäjdnetji
